Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1
AUTOMOBILE THEFT

42-5-101. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Calendar year" means the twelve calendar months beginning January first and ending December thirty-first of any year.

"Dealer" means all persons, firms, partnerships, associations, or corporations engaged in the business or vocation of manufacturing, buying, selling, trading, dealing in, destroying, disposing of, or salvaging motor vehicles or in secondhand or used motor vehicle parts, equipment, attachments, accessories, or appurtenances common to or a part of motor vehicles.

"Driver" means the person operating or driving a motor vehicle.

"Garage" means any public building or place of business for the storage or repair of motor vehicles.

"Motor vehicle" means any vehicle of whatever description propelled by any power other than muscular except a vehicle running on rails.

"Officer" means any duly constituted peace officer of this state, or of any town, city, county, or city and county in this state.

"Owner" means any person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation.

"Peace officer" means every officer authorized to direct or regulate traffic or to make arrests for violations of traffic regulations.

"Person" includes a partnership, company, corporation, or association.

"Public highway" means any public street, thoroughfare, roadway, alley, lane, or bridge in any county or city and county in the state.

"Vehicle identification number" means any identifying number, serial number, engine number, or other distinguishing number or mark, including letters, if any, that is unique to the identity of a given vehicle or component part thereof that was placed on a vehicle or engine by its manufacturer or by authority of the department of revenue pursuant to section 42-12-202 or in accordance with the laws of another state or country.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2439, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(11) amended, p. 1645, § 34, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

(11) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 247, § 14, effective August 10.

42-5-102. Stolen motor vehicle parts - buying, selling - removed or altered motor vehicle parts - possession. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2440, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1562, § 372, effective October 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (SB 14-176), ch. 392, p. 1983, § 2, effective August 6.

42-5-103. Tampering with a motor vehicle.

Any person who with criminal intent does any of the following to a motor vehicle or to any part, equipment, attachment, accessory, or appurtenance contained in or forming a part thereof without the knowledge and consent of the owner of such motor vehicle commits tampering with a motor vehicle:

Tightens or loosens any bolt, bracket, wire, screw, or other fastening contained in, contained on, or forming a part of such motor vehicle; or

Shifts or changes the gears or brakes of such motor vehicle; or

Scratches, mars, marks, or otherwise damages such motor vehicle or any part thereof; or

Adds any substance or liquid to the gas tank, carburetor, oil, radiator, or any other part of such motor vehicle; or

Aids, abets, or assists in the commission or attempted commission of any such unlawful act or acts enumerated in this subsection (1).

Tampering with a motor vehicle is:

A class 1 misdemeanor if the damage is less than one thousand dollars;

A class 5 felony if the damage is one thousand dollars or more but less than twenty thousand dollars;

A class 3 felony if the damage is twenty thousand dollars or more or causes bodily injury to a person.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2440, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 799, § 16, effective July 1; (2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 1441, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 1697, § 16, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 384, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

42-5-104. Theft of motor vehicle parts - theft of license plates.

Any person who with criminal intent removes, detaches, or takes from a motor vehicle which is the property of another any part, equipment, attachment, accessory, or appurtenance contained therein, contained thereon, or forming a part thereof or any person who aids, abets, or assists in the commission of any such act or acts is guilty of theft of motor vehicle parts.

Theft of motor vehicle parts is:

A class 1 misdemeanor if the value of the thing involved is less than one thousand dollars;

A class 5 felony if the value of the thing involved is one thousand dollars or more but less than twenty thousand dollars;

A class 3 felony if the value of the thing involved is twenty thousand dollars or more.

When a person commits theft of motor vehicle parts two times or more within a period of six months without having been placed in jeopardy for the prior offense or offenses and the aggregate value of the things involved is one thousand dollars or more but less than twenty thousand dollars, it is a class 5 felony; however, if the aggregate value of the things involved is twenty thousand dollars or more, it is a class 4 felony.

Any person who steals a license plate shall be in violation of paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2441, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 1441, § 23, effective July 1; (2)(a), (2)(b), and (3) amended, p. 799, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4) added, p. 2649, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1697, § 17, effective July 1.

Cross references:

(1) For penalties for class 2 misdemeanors, see § 18-1.3-501; for penalties for class 3, 4, or 5 felonies, see § 18-1.3-401.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act amending subsections (2) and (3), see section 1 of chapter 384, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

42-5-105. Daily record.

It is the duty of every dealer, and of the proprietor of every garage, to keep and maintain in such person's place of business an easily accessible and permanent daily record of all secondhand or used motor vehicle equipment, attachments, accessories, and appurtenances bought, sold, traded, exchanged, dealt in, repaired, or received or disposed of in any manner or way by or through the dealer or proprietor. The record may be created, recorded, stored, or reproduced physically or electronically.

The record shall be kept in a good businesslike manner in the form of invoices or in a book by the dealer or proprietor and shall contain the following:

A description of any and all such articles of property of every class or kind sufficient for the ready identification thereof by a peace officer;

The name and address, legibly written, of the owner, vendor, and vendee;

The time and date of such transactions;

The name, address, and a copy of the identification document of the driver and the owner of a motor vehicle received for any purpose; except that a licensed motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer is not required to obtain or retain a copy of an identification document if the dealer complies with part 1 of article 20 of title 44;

The model year, make and style, and engine or vehicle identification number and state registration license number of such motor vehicle if registered; and

The purpose the motor vehicle was received and the disposition made thereof.

The record shall be open and the motor vehicle shall be available at all times during regular business hours to the inspection by the department of revenue or any peace officer and available for use as evidence.

It is the duty of every person offering to a dealer, or to the proprietor of a garage, for any purpose, a motor vehicle or secondhand or used motor vehicle equipment, attachment, accessory, or appurtenance to:

Write or register, as legibly as possible, the full and true name and address of the person and the name and address of the owner in the record kept by such dealer or proprietor of a garage as provided for in this section; and

Present a valid identification document verifiable by federal or state law enforcement. The following documents, without limitation, shall be deemed to comply with this paragraph (b):

An identification document issued by the state of Colorado;

An identification document issued by any other state;

An identification document issued by the United States government;

A passport issued by the United States government or another jurisdiction.

It is the duty of every driver, upon taking a motor vehicle to any dealer's place of business or to any garage for storage, repair, sale, trade, or any other purpose, to write or register, as legibly as possible, with ink or indelible pencil, the full and true name and address of the driver and the name and address of the owner of such motor vehicle in the record provided for in this section. Such driver shall not be required, however, to so register the same motor vehicle more than once in the same garage in any calendar year when the driver is personally known to the dealer or the proprietor of the garage to be in the rightful and lawful possession of such motor vehicle. Such driver, on request or demand of such dealer or proprietor of a garage, or his or her agent, shall produce for examination the motor vehicle state registration license certificate issued to such driver or to the owner of such motor vehicle.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2441, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2007:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1628, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(b)(IV) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2067, § 56, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1)(b)(IV) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 143, § 23, effective October 1.

42-5-106. Duties of dealers - assembled motor vehicles.

It is the duty of every dealer and of every proprietor of a garage to examine, without charge, the engine or vehicle identification number of every motor vehicle bought, taken in trade, repaired, or stored by them. Such dealer shall not be required to examine the engine or vehicle identification number of the same motor vehicle more than once in the same calendar year when such dealer knows that the person in possession of such motor vehicle is the lawful owner thereof. It is the further duty of the dealer, proprietor of a garage, or his or her agent, promptly and without delay, to report to or notify in person, or by telephone or telegraph, or by special messenger the nearest police station or peace officer if the engine or vehicle identification number of said motor vehicle has been altered, changed, or so obliterated as to make the number indecipherable or if the engine or vehicle identification number or the state registration license number of said motor vehicle does not correspond with the engine or vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle state registration certificate of the driver of said motor vehicle. Any person violating any of the provisions of this section commits a class 1 petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2442, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1563, § 373, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-5-107. Seizure of motor vehicles or component parts by peace officers.

All peace officers are authorized to take and hold possession of any motor vehicle or component part if its engine number, vehicle identification number, or manufacturer's serial number has been altered, changed, or obliterated or if such officer has good and sufficient reason to believe that the motor vehicle or component part is not in the rightful possession of the driver or person in charge thereof.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2442, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-5-108. Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this part 1, unless otherwise specifically provided for in this part 1, commits a class 3 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2443, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1563, § 374, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-5-109. Report of stored or parked motor vehicles - when.

Whenever any motor vehicle of a type subject to registration in this state has been stored, parked, or left in a garage, a trailer park, or any type of storage or parking lot for a period of over thirty days, the owner of such garage, trailer park, or lot shall report the make, engine number, vehicle identification number, and serial number of such motor vehicle in writing to the Colorado state patrol auto theft section, Denver, Colorado, and the sheriff of the county in which the garage, trailer park, or lot is located. Nothing in this section shall apply where arrangements have been made for continuous storage or parking by the owner of the motor vehicle so parked or stored and where the owner of said motor vehicle so parked or stored is personally known to the owner or operator of such garage, trailer park, or storage or parking lot. Any person who fails to submit the report required under this section at the end of thirty days shall forfeit all claims for storage of such motor vehicles and shall be subject to a fine of not more than twenty-five dollars, and each day's failure to make such a report as required under this section shall constitute a separate offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2443, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-5-110. Possession of removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed motor vehicle identification numbers.

No person shall knowingly buy, sell, offer for sale, receive, or possess any motor vehicle or component part thereof from which the vehicle identification number or any number placed on said vehicle or component part for its identification by the manufacturer has been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed unless such vehicle or component part has attached thereto a special identification number assigned or approved by the department in lieu of the manufacturer's number.

Whenever such motor vehicle or component part comes into the custody of a peace officer, it shall be destroyed, sold, or otherwise disposed of under the conditions provided in an order by the court having jurisdiction. No court order providing for disposition shall be issued unless the person from whom the property was seized and all claimants to the property whose interest or title is on the records in the department of revenue are provided a postseizure hearing by the court having jurisdiction within a reasonable period after the seizure. This postseizure hearing shall be held on those motor vehicles or component parts for which true ownership is in doubt, including, but not limited to, those motor vehicles or component parts that are altered to the extent that they cannot be identified, those motor vehicles or component parts that are composed of parts belonging to several different claimants, and those motor vehicles or component parts for which there are two or more existing titles. This subsection (2) shall not apply with respect to such motor vehicle or component part used as evidence in any criminal action or proceeding. Nothing in this section shall, however, preclude the return of such motor vehicle or component part to the owner by the seizing agency following presentation of satisfactory evidence of ownership and, if it is determined to be necessary, upon assignment of an identification number to the vehicle or component part by the department of revenue. There shall be no special identification number issued for a component part unless it is a component part of a complete motor vehicle.

Whenever such motor vehicle or component part comes into the custody of a peace officer, the person from whom the property was seized and all claimants to the property whose interest or title is noted on the records of the department of revenue shall be notified within ninety days of seizure of the seizing agency's intent to commence a postseizure hearing as described in subsection (2) of this section. Such notice shall contain the following information:

The name and address of the person or persons from whom the motor vehicle or component part was seized;

A statement that the motor vehicle or component part has been seized for investigation as provided in this section and that the property will be released upon a determination that the identification number has not been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed or upon the presentation of satisfactory evidence of the ownership of such motor vehicle or component part if no other person claims an interest in the property within thirty days of the date the notice is mailed; otherwise, a hearing regarding the disposition of such motor vehicle or component part shall take place in the court having jurisdiction;

A statement that the person from whom the property was seized and all claimants to the motor vehicle or component part whose interest or title is on the records in the department of revenue will have notification of the seizing agency's intention to commence a postseizure hearing, and such notice shall be sent to the last-known address by registered mail within ninety days of the date of seizure;

The name and address of the law enforcement agency where the evidence of ownership of such motor vehicle or component part may be presented;

A statement or copy of the text contained in this section.

A hearing on the disposition of the motor vehicle or component part shall be held by the court having jurisdiction within a reasonable time after the seizure. The hearing shall be before the court without a jury.

If the evidence reveals either that the identification number has not been removed, altered, or destroyed or that the identification has been removed, altered, or destroyed but satisfactory evidence of ownership has been presented, then the motor vehicle or component part shall be released to the person entitled thereto. Nothing in this section shall preclude the return of such motor vehicle or component part to a good faith purchaser following the presentation of satisfactory evidence of ownership thereof, and, if necessary, said good faith purchaser may be required to obtain an assigned identification number from the motor vehicle group.

If the evidence reveals that the identification number of the motor vehicle or the component part has been removed, altered, or destroyed and satisfactory evidence of ownership has not been presented, then the property shall be destroyed, sold, or converted to the use of the seizing agency or otherwise disposed of as provided by court order.

At the hearing, the seizing agency shall have the burden of establishing that the identification number of the motor vehicle or the component part has been removed, defaced, altered, or destroyed.

At the hearing, any claimant to the property shall have the burden of providing satisfactory evidence of ownership.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2443, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1), (2), IP(3), (3)(c), and (4)(b) amended, p. 1646, § 35, effective June 1.

42-5-111. Proof of authorized possession.

Whenever any motor vehicle or major component part of a motor vehicle is transported, shipped, towed, or hauled by any means in this state, said vehicle or component part shall be accompanied by proper authorization of possession from the legal owner or a law enforcement agency. Such authorization may include, but need not be limited to, bills of lading, shipment invoices, towing requests, or other specific authorization which readily identifies the rightful owner and conveys said owner's authorization of possession to the person transporting the motor vehicle or component part.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2445, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-5-112. Automobile theft prevention authority - board - creation - duties - rules - fund - repeal.

There is hereby created in the department of public safety the automobile theft prevention authority, referred to in this section as the "authority". Under the authority, a law enforcement agency or other qualified applicant may apply for grants to assist in improving and supporting automobile theft prevention programs or programs for the enforcement or prosecution of automobile theft crimes through statewide planning and coordination.

There is hereby created the automobile theft prevention board, referred to in this section as the "board", which shall consist of eleven members as follows:

The executive director of the department of public safety, or the executive director's designee;

The executive director of the department of revenue, or the executive director's designee; and

Nine members appointed by the governor as follows:

Five representatives of insurance companies who are authorized to issue motor vehicle insurance policies pursuant to part 6 of article 4 of title 10, C.R.S.;

Two representatives of law enforcement;

A representative of a statewide association of district attorneys; and

A representative of the public who may also be a representative of a consumer group.

The governor shall appoint members of the board within thirty days after the governor receives notification pursuant to subsection (5) of this section that moneys in the fund exceed the sum of three hundred thousand dollars. The appointed members of the board shall serve terms of six years; except that, of the members first appointed pursuant to sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the governor shall select one member who shall serve an initial term of four years and one member who shall serve an initial term of two years. Of the members first appointed pursuant to sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the governor shall select one member who shall serve an initial term of two years. The member first appointed pursuant to sub-subparagraph (C) of subparagraph (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall serve an initial term of four years. No appointed member shall serve more than two consecutive six-year terms.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), of the two additional members appointed to the board pursuant to Senate Bill 08-060, enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-sixth general assembly, one member shall serve an initial term of four years and one member shall serve an initial term of two years.

The members of the board shall serve without compensation; except that the members of the board shall be reimbursed from moneys in the fund created in subsection (4) of this section for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties pursuant to this section.

The board shall solicit and review applications for grants pursuant to this section. The board may award grants for one to three years. The board shall give priority to applications representing multijurisdictional programs. Each application, at a minimum, shall describe the type of theft prevention, enforcement, prosecution, or offender rehabilitation program to be implemented. Such programs may include, but need not be limited to:

Multi-agency law enforcement and national insurance crime bureau task force programs using proactive investigative methods to reduce the incidents of motor vehicle theft and related crimes and to increase the apprehension of motor vehicle thieves and persons who attempt to defraud insurance companies in order to:

Direct proactive investigative and enforcement efforts toward the reduction of motor vehicle thefts;

Increase recoveries of stolen motor vehicles, including farm and construction equipment; and

Increase the arrests of perpetrators;

Programs that engage in crime prevention efforts, activities, and public awareness campaigns that are intended to reduce the public's victimization by motor vehicle theft, fraud, and related crimes;

Programs that provide or develop specialized training for motor vehicle theft investigations personnel, including but not limited to law enforcement personnel, county title and registration clerks, division of revenue title clerks, and port-of-entry officials, in order to enhance knowledge, skills, procedures, and systems to detect, prevent, and combat motor vehicle theft and fraud and related crimes;

Programs to provide for the support and maintenance of one or more dedicated prosecutors who have the specific mission and expertise to provide legal guidance and prosecutorial continuity to complex criminal cases arising from the activities of a multi-agency law enforcement program; and

Programs to prevent future criminal behavior by first time offenders who have been charged, convicted, or adjudicated for motor vehicle theft.

Subject to available moneys, the board shall approve grants pursuant to this section. In selecting grant recipients, the board, to the extent possible, shall ensure that grants are awarded to law enforcement agencies or other qualified applicants in a variety of geographic areas of the state. The board shall not require as a condition of receipt of a grant that an agency, political subdivision, or other qualified applicant provide any additional moneys to operate an automobile theft prevention program or a program for the enforcement or prosecution of automobile theft crimes.

Subject to available moneys, the board may appoint a director for the authority who may employ such staff as may be necessary to operate and administer the authority.

No more than eight percent of the moneys in the fund created pursuant to subsection (4) of this section may be used for operational or administrative expenses of the authority.

The FTE authorization for any staff necessary to support the authority shall be eliminated should sufficient moneys from gifts, grants, or donations no longer be available for the authority.

The executive director of the department of public safety shall promulgate rules for the administration of this section, including but not limited to:

Requirements for an entity other than a law enforcement agency to be a qualified applicant;

Application procedures by which law enforcement agencies or other qualified applicants may apply for grants pursuant to this section;

The criteria for selecting those agencies or other qualified applicants that shall receive grants and the criteria for determining the amount to be granted to the selected agencies or applicants and the duration of the grants; and

Procedures for reviewing the success of the programs that receive grants pursuant to this section.

On or before December 1, 2006, any law enforcement agency or other qualified applicant that receives a grant pursuant to this section shall submit a report to the board concerning the implementation of the program funded through the grant.

On or before February 1, 2007, the board shall report to the judiciary committees of the senate and the house of representatives on the implementation of the programs receiving grants pursuant to this section and the authority. The report shall include but need not be limited to:

The number and geographic jurisdiction of law enforcement agencies or other qualified applicants that received grants under the authority and the amount and duration of the grants;

The effect that the programs that received grants had on the number of automobile thefts in areas of the state; and

Recommendations for legislative changes to assist in the prevention, enforcement, and prosecution of automobile-theft-related criminal activities.

The department of public safety is authorized to accept gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section. All private and public funds received through gifts, grants, or donations shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the Colorado auto theft prevention cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this section as the "fund". The fund shall also include the moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to section 10-4-617, C.R.S. The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation of this section. Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of this section may be invested by the state treasurer as provided in section 24-36-113, C.R.S. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the department of public safety not be required to solicit gifts, grants, or donations from any source for the purposes of this section and that no general fund moneys be used to pay for grants awarded pursuant to this section or for any expenses of the authority.

The state treasurer shall notify the governor and the executive directors of the departments of public safety and revenue the first time that the moneys in the fund reach or exceed the sum of three hundred thousand dollars.

If by June 1, 2008, moneys in the fund have never reached or exceeded three hundred thousand dollars, the state treasurer shall return from the fund to the grantee or donee the amount of all gifts, grants, or donations. If gifts, grants, and donations are returned pursuant to this paragraph (b), on July 1, 2008, the treasurer shall transfer to the general fund any interest or income earned on moneys in the fund.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2029.

Prior to said repeal, the authority created pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and the board created pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be reviewed as provided for in section 24-34-104, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1326, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2004:

(2)(a)(III)(A) amended, p. 906, § 35, effective May 21.

L. 2008:

IP(2)(a), IP(2)(a)(III), (2)(a)(III)(A), (4)(a), and (6) amended and (2)(b.5) added, p. 2097, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(6)(a) amended, (HB 18-1240), ch. 209, p. 1341, § 2, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending the introductory portions to subsections (2)(a) and (2)(a)(III) and subsections (2)(a)(III)(A), (4)(a), and (6) and enacting subsection (2)(b.5), see section 1 of chapter 415, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

42-5-113. Colorado auto theft prevention cash fund - audit.

Beginning in the 2008-09 fiscal year, and every five years thereafter, the state auditor shall cause an audit to be made of the Colorado auto theft prevention cash fund created in section 42-5-112 (4) to include procedures to test distributions from the fund for compliance with program requirements and guidelines. The state auditor shall review a sample of distributions and expenditures from the Colorado auto theft prevention cash fund for the purposes described in section 42-5-112. The state auditor shall prepare a report of each audit conducted and file the report with the audit committee of the general assembly. Following the release of the audit report, the state auditor shall file the audit report with the judiciary committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 2098, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-129), ch. 284, p. 1493, § 5, effective May 24.

L. 2017:

(1)(b)(IV) amended, (SB 17-240), ch.395, p. 2067, § 56, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1416, § 113, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 415, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.